RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/ca_ES.dic
acaramel·lat/EVY
acienti/D
acrimoniós/IVY
actinoteràpia/EVY
adequació/GVY
aeropiezisme/EVY
afaiçonem/D
afectuós/IVY
aftós/IVY
agostador/EVY
agravació/GVY
agredolç/IVY
aigualegi/D
aiguamoix/IVY
alabès/IVY
alcaic/EVY
alfardó/GVY
alficòs/IVY
alumenada/EVY
aluminós/IVY
amatoni/D
americana/GVY
amiotròfia/EVY
anestèsia/EVY
angoixós/IVY
anteposició/GVY
antinatural/EVY
antivariolós/IVY
aparta/D
apilada/EVY
aquità/GVY
arboç/IVY
arcabussejada/EVY
arpelleja/D
arrapós/IVY
arribat/EVY
assenyada/EVY
assetgi/D
assiriana/GVY
astomatós/IVY
atrofiada/EVY
autovaccí/GVY
avantpaís/IVY
avergonyeixi/D
aviciat/EVY
bardissam/E
baromètric/F
barrat/BE
begui/D
benedicció/G
benentès/I
bergantell/F
besantat/B
bicarpel·lar/E
blanc/F
blau/B
boix/IJ
borradura/E
bossut/B
botaló/G
bouenc/F
branquegi/D
brufat/B
buixot/E
burgmestre/F
calabrotat/B
calaix/I
calidoscòpic/F
calua/E
cal·ligrafització/G
camanduleja/D
canusit/B
capellaner/F
caragolament/E
carbonejat/B
carnificació/G
cartutx/I
castelloner/F
catèter/E
cautxuta/D
cavallonat/B
centralitzador/F
ciclocròs/I
ciclohexà/G
cisma/E
ciutadejat/B
civader/F
coexistit/B
cognició/G
colltort/EF
colltrenca/D
color/E
combregat/B
compungit/B
comunicació/G
concèntric/F
configuri/D
conformat/B
connivència/E
conspiració/G
constatat/B
contradictor/F
contrapunxonat/B
contrapès/I
contrasegelli/D
coparticipació/G
corimbe/E
corsecador/F
crestejat/B
cronogràfic/F
csi/G
cucleja/D
curs/I
còrnic/F
decreixença/E
defensiu/B
deflexió/G
demogràfic/F
denigri/D
desadherit/B
desagregació/G
desarnesi/D
desblocat/B
descolonitzi/D
desdejunat/B
desemmanta/D
desempomat/B
desencortini/D
desengolfat/B
desensuperbesqui/D
desfardat/B
desgranador/F
designa/D
desincorporació/G
desmesclat/B
despampola/D
dessalat/B
destrucció/G
desvira/D
devorador/F
digerit/B
dijous/I
dinamiter/F
discent/E
discussió/G
distregui/D
diàdic/F
dosificat/B
duodè/G
dèltic/F
elegíaca/EVY
elogiós/IVY
emasculació/GVY
embadoca/D
emmalalteixi/D
empini/D
empotingada/EVY
encalç/IVY
encarcanya/D
enderiïn/D
enforcada/EVY
enganyapastors/IVY
engarbulli/D
ennuvoli/D
entatxoni/D
entomòfag/EVY
entès/IVY
envaïu/D
equiparació/GVY
esblanqueït/EVY
esbornagui/D
escalfaplats/IVY
escatós/IVY
esclafassi/D
escurapous/IVY
esfigmògraf/EVY
esgrifolla/D
espal·lació/GVY
espars/IVY
espicassa/D
espuri/EVY
esqueix/IVY
esterifica/D
estoniana/GVY
estrepitós/IVY
esverat/EVY
exclami/D
excorticació/GVY
extraplà/GVY
extrors/IVY
fanguer/E
fecundi/D
feldspatoídic/F
fertirrigació/G
filtrador/F
finançat/B
flint-glass/I
fomentador/F
forceja/D
formatació/G
fosfur/E
fraresc/F
fraternitzat/B
fílmic/F
gallimó/G
garfesqui/D
gas/I
gasejat/B
gaèlic/F
giga/E
ginomonoic/F
glaciació/G
gramaticastre/F
groc/B
gronxoli/D
guardabraç/I
guixoter/F
havana/GVY
hemicel·lulosa/EVY
hipoclorós/IVY
hipogàstric/FVY
homogeneïtzació/GVY
illa/EVY
illenc/FVY
implanta/D
implorat/BVY
imprevisió/GY
incrèdul/FVY
induració/GY
infantat/BEVY
infix/IVY
instil·la/D
instil·lació/GY
intercontinental/EVY
interrogatiu/BVY
invocació/GY
involut/FVY
laïcitzar/D
lectiu/B
lexicogràfic/F
lexicó/G
llac/E
llepadits/I
llonzí/G
lluït/B
límnic/F
magregi/D
malvapeix/I
mangala/E
manxat/B
maquetació/G
marer/F
matallops/I
maçolar/D
mesuró/G
metalingüístic/F
migrolat/B
migtemps/I
mil·lenarisme/E
moliner/F
mol·lificació/G
morfesqui/D
mut/B
màgic/F
natal/E
nató/G
novel·lesc/F
obagós/IVY
obnubila/D
obtenció/GVY
ofès/IVY
oleogràfica/EVY
ordiós/IVY
orticó/GVY
pairal/E
palpitat/B
parraquer/F
partió/G
passa-rius/I
peonat/B
peralt/E
permutació/G
perora/D
perspicaç/I
pertorbador/F
pixat/BE
plebs/I
plomaller/F
poda/DE
portaescuradents/I
postració/G
potenciador/F
predisposat/B
privi/D
prospectiu/B
prosèlit/F
prussianisme/E
punció/G
queix/I
quimèric/F
raptat/B
receptacular/E
recobra/D
reconegut/B
reduplicació/G
reflector/F
reflux/I
regitat/B
repalegi/D
repenedit/B
repès/I
retortilló/G
retorçut/B
revisor/F
roina/DE
rotllat/BE
rufianeja/D
salaç/I
santificador/F
selecció/G
sender/E
sentenciat/B
significador/F
sis/I
soguejat/B
somniï/D
sorrejador/F
sublimació/G
subsistent/E
suggerit/B
tafarrer/F
tapajunts/I
termenat/B
termòfil/F
terrissaire/E
testificació/G
tirapits/I
tonifica/D
transigit/B
trapasser/F
traç/I
triomfant/CE
troleibús/I
tudat/B
tudó/G
típic/F
veda/DE
vergassejat/B
versallesc/F
vet/E
voltadits/I
xamfrà/G
xemicat/B
xuplador/F
èster/EVY
